Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.460

Registered owner.

"Registered owner" means the person whose lawful right of possession of a vehicle has most recently been recorded with the department.

[ 1975 c 25 s 3; 1961 c 12 s 46.04.460. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 50; prior: 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part.]